Utah statutes.
67-5-23.   Personal use of state vehicles for law enforcement officers.

The attorney general may authorize up to 28 law enforcement officers, as defined under Section 53-13-103, who are employees in the Office of the Attorney General to use a state issued vehicle for official and personal use.



Enacted by Chapter 67, 2007 General Session

